Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3925
Commission; chairperson; expenses.

The Governor shall designate one of the members of the commission as the chairperson. The members of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 24.